Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-624
Criminal possession of a blank financial transaction device; penalties.

(1) A person commits the offense of criminal possession of a blank financial transaction device if, without the authorization of the issuer or manufacturer, such person has in his or her possession, has under his or her control, or receives from another person a blank financial transaction device, with intent to use or to cause the use of such device.

(2) Any person committing the offense of criminal possession of a blank financial transaction device shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) Any person committing the offense of criminal possession of two or more blank financial transaction devices shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 8.